Washington statutes.
RCW 23B.14.390

Secretary of state—List of corporations dissolved.

On the first day of each month, the secretary of state shall prepare a list of corporations dissolved during the preceding month pursuant to RCW 23B.14.030, 23B.14.330, and 23.95.610.

[ 2015 c 176 s 2129; 1995 c 47 s 8.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Contingent effective date—2015 c 176: See note following RCW 23.95.100.